Maryland, session 2025, HB0957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
16–203.
(a) A person may be debarred from entering into a contract with the State if the
person, an officer, partner, controlling stockholder or principal of that person, or any other
person substantially involved in that person’s contracting activities has:
(1) been convicted under the laws of the State, another state or the United
States of:
(i) a criminal offense incident to obtaining, attempting to obtain, or
performing a public or private contract, except as provided in § 16–202 of this subtitle; or
(ii) fraud, embezzlement, theft, forgery, falsification or destruction
of records, or receiving stolen property;
(2) been convicted of a criminal violation of an antitrust statute of the
State, another state, or the United States;
(3) been convicted of a violation of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt
Organization Act, or the Mail Fraud Act, for acts in connection with the submission of bids
or proposals for a public or private contract;
(4) been convicted of a violation of § 14–308 of this article;
(5) been convicted of conspiracy to commit any act or omission that would
constitute grounds for conviction under any of the laws or statutes described in items (1),
(2), (3), or (4) of this subsection;
(6) been convicted of a violation of § 7201, § 7203, § 7205, § 7206, or § 7207
of the Internal Revenue Code;
(7) been convicted of a violation of 18 U.S.C. § 286, § 287, or § 371;
(8) been convicted of a violation of Title 13, Subtitle 7 or Subtitle 10 of the
Tax – General Article;
(9) been found to have willfully or knowingly violated Title 17, Subtitle 2
or Title 18 of this article if:
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or

HOUSE BILL 957 3
(ii) 1. the finding was made in a contested case under the
Administrative Procedure Act; and
2. the finding was not overturned on judicial review;
(10) been found to have willfully or knowingly violated Title 3, Subtitle 3,
Subtitle 4, or Subtitle 5 or Title 5 of the Labor and Employment Article if:
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or
(ii) 1. the finding was made in a contested case under the
Administrative Procedure Act; and
2. the finding was not overturned on judicial review;
(11) been found civilly liable under an antitrust statute of the State, another
state, or the United States for acts or omissions in connection with the submission of bids
or proposals for a public or private contract;
(12) been found to have willfully or knowingly violated Title 20, Subtitle 6
of the State Government Article if:
(i) 1. the finding was made by a court; and
2. the decision of the court became final; or
(ii) 1. the finding was made in a contested case under the
Administrative Procedure Act; and
2. the finding was not overturned on judicial review; or
(13) been found in a final adjudicated decision to have violated the
Commercial Nondiscrimination Policy under Title 19 of this article with regard to a public
or private contract.
(b) A person may be debarred from entering into a contract with the State if,
during the course of an official investigation or other proceedings, the person, an officer,
partner, controlling stockholder or principal of that person, or any other person
substantially involved in that person’s contracting activities has admitted, in writing or
under oath, an act or omission that constitutes grounds for conviction or liability under any
law or statute described in subsection (a) of this section.
(c) A person may be debarred from entering into a contract with the State if the
person, an officer, partner, controlling stockholder or principal of that person, or any other

HOUSE BILL 957
person substantially involved in that person’s contracting activities has been debarred from
federal contracts under:
(1) the Federal Acquisition Regulations, as provided in 48 C.F.R. Chapter
1; or
(2) federal Executive Order 11246, as amended due to discriminatory
hiring practices in the State.
(d) A person may be debarred from entering into a contract with the State:
(1) if the Board finds that the person was established or operates in a
manner designed to evade the application of this title or to defeat the purpose of this title;
(2) if the person is a successor, assignee, subsidiary, or affiliate of a person
who is debarred or suspended;
(3) except as provided under item (4) of this subsection, for one of the
following violations of a contract provision if the Board believes it to be serious enough to
justify debarment:
(i) the deliberate failure, without good cause, to perform in
accordance with the specifications, or within the time limit, provided in a contract; or
(ii) within the preceding 5 years, the failure to perform or
unsatisfactory performance in accordance with the terms of one or more contracts, unless
the failure to perform or unsatisfactory performance was caused by acts beyond the control
of the person;
(4) for a period not exceeding 3 years if the person persistently fails to meet
contract goals in the absence of mitigating factors under the criteria established under §
14–305(c)(2) of this article;
(5) FOR A PERIOD NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS IF THE PERSON IS FOUND
TO HAVE VIOLATED THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 17, SUBTITLE 6B § 17–6B–03 OF
THIS ARTICLE TWICE FIVE TIMES IN A 10–YEAR 5–YEAR PERIOD;
[(5)] (6) if the person is a competing contractor, or any officer, employee,
representative, agent, or consultant of any competing contractor who violates § 13–211 of
this article; or
[(6)] (7) for any other cause that the Board determines to be so serious as
to affect the integrity of the procurement process.
17–602.
(a) There is a State Apprenticeship Training Fund in the Department.

HOUSE BILL 957 5
(b) The Fund consists of:
(1) payments made by contractors or subcontractors in accordance with
this subtitle and Subtitle 6A of this title; and
(2) penalties collected as a result of violations of this subtitle and [Subtitle]
SUBTITLES 6A AND 6B of this title.
(c) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of this
article.
(d) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(e) The Secretary shall use money in the Fund to:
(1) promote preapprenticeship programs and other workforce development
programs in the State’s public secondary schools and community colleges that assist
students in preparing for and entering apprenticeship training programs; and
(2) pay any costs associated with carrying out the provisions of this subtitle
and [Subtitle] SUBTITLES 6A AND 6B of this title.
SUBTITLE 6B. WORKER RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS.
17–6B–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “APPRENTICEABLE HOUR” MEANS 25% OF THE TOTAL OF JOURNEY
HOURS PLUS APPRENTICESHIP HOURS.
(C) (B) “APPRENTICESHIP HOUR” MEANS 1 HOUR OF TIME SPENT IN AN
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM AND MAY INCLUDE OBSERVATION, PERFORMING WORK,
OR WORK–RELATED DISCUSSION.
(D) (C) “COVERED LARGE PROJECT” MEANS A STATE–FUNDED PROJECT
PUBLIC WORK CONTRACT SUBJECT TO SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS TITLE THAT IS VALUED
AT $5,000,000 OR MORE.
(E) “COVERED SMALL PROJECT” MEANS A STATE–FUNDED PROJECT THAT
IS VALUED AT EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN $300,000 BUT LESS THAN $5,000,000.

HOUSE BILL 957
(F) (D) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
LABOR.
(G) (E) “NEW APPRENTICE” MEANS AN APPRENTICE:
(1) EMPLOYED TO LEARN A SKILLED TRADE THROUGH ENROLLED IN
A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM;
(2) WHOSE START DATE OF EMPLOYMENT WITH A COMPANY IS AFTER
THE DATE ON WHICH THE STATE CONTRACT IS AWARDED BUT BEFORE OR DURING
THE PERFORMANCE OF THE STATE CONTRACT; AND
(3) WHO IS EITHER NEW TO THE COMPANY OR HAS BEEN SEPARATED
FROM THE COMPANY FOR AT LEAST 60 DAYS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF HIRE.
(H) “NEW EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) WHOSE START DATE OF EMPLOYMENT WITH A COMPANY IS AFTER
THE DATE ON WHICH THE STATE CONTRACT IS AWARDED BUT BEFORE OR DURING
THE PERFORMANCE OF THE STATE CONTRACT; AND
(2) WHO IS EITHER NEW TO THE COMPANY OR WHO HAS BEEN
SEPARATED FROM THE COMPANY FOR AT LEAST 60 DAYS PRIOR TO THE DATE OF
HIRE.
(E) “REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM” MEANS AN
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM REGISTERED WITH THE DIVISION OF WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT AND ADULT LEARNING WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(I) (F) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF LABOR.
17–6B–02.
THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO CONTRACTORS AWARDED STATE
CONTRACTS WITH A TOTAL VALUE EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN $500,000 WITHIN
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THIS
SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) CONTRACTORS AWARDED A STATE CONTRACT THAT IS A COVERED
LARGE PROJECT; AND
(2) COVERED LARGE PROJECTS LOCATED IN:

HOUSE BILL 957 7
(I) ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY;
(II) BALTIMORE CITY;
(III) BALTIMORE COUNTY;
(IV) HOWARD COUNTY;
(V) MONTGOMERY COUNTY; AND
(VI) PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO A STATE CONTRACT FOR WHICH
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT PROVIDES MONEY.
17–6B–03.
(A) A CONTRACTOR THAT IS AWARDED A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR A
COVERED SMALL LARGE PROJECT SHALL ENSURE THAT, FOR THE APPLICABLE
PROJECT:
(1) AT LEAST 51% OF THE TOTAL NUMBER OF NEW EMPLOYEES AND
NEW APPRENTICES ARE STATE RESIDENTS; AND
(2), AT LEAST 35% OF APPRENTICESHIP HOURS ARE PERFORMED BY
STATE RESIDENTS.
(B) A CONTRACTOR THAT IS AWARDED A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR A
COVERED LARGE PROJECT SHALL ENSURE THAT, FOR THE APPLICABLE PROJECT:
(1) AT LEAST 20% OF JOURNEY WORKER HOURS ARE PERFORMED BY
STATE RESIDENTS;
(2) AT LEAST 51% OF SKILLED WORKER HOURS ARE PERFORMED BY
STATE RESIDENTS;
(3) AT LEAST 70% OF COMMON LABOR WORKER HOURS ARE
PERFORMED BY STATE RESIDENTS;
(4) AT LEAST 60% OF APPRENTICESHIP HOURS ARE PERFORMED BY
STATE RESIDENTS; AND
(5) AT LEAST 35% OF ALL APPRENTICEABLE HOURS ARE PERFORMED
BY STATE RESIDENTS.

HOUSE BILL 957
(C) (B) AS A CONDITION OF RECEIVING THE CONTRACT, A CONTRACTOR
SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE UNIT AND THE DEPARTMENT A
STATEMENT ATTESTING THAT THE CONTRACTOR SHALL MEET THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION FOR THE APPLICABLE PROJECT.
17–6B–04.
(A) THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS AUTHORIZING A
CONTRACTOR, AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO FULFILLING THE REQUIREMENTS OF §
17–6B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE, TO ELECT TO MAKE A CONTRIBUTION TO:
(1) THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 17–602 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(2) A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM OPERATING AND
TRAINING APPRENTICES IN THE STATE AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO FULFILLING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 17–6B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ENFORCING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) WHEN DETERMINING COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE, APPLICABLE
PERCENTAGES ESTABLISHED UNDER § 17–6B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE
CALCULATED BY ROUNDING TO THE NEAREST WHOLE NUMBER.
17–6B–05.
A CONTRACTOR THAT EXCEEDS THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 17–6B–03(A) OF
THIS SUBTITLE ON A CONTRACT MAY APPLY THE EXCESS APPRENTICESHIP HOURS
TO ANOTHER CONTRACT SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE THAT IS ENTERED INTO BY THE
CONTRACTOR WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE FIRST CONTRACT.
17–6B–06.
(A) A CONTRACTOR THAT FAILS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 0.125% OF THE TOTAL
DIRECT AND INDIRECT LABOR COSTS OF THE CONTRACT FOR EACH PERCENTAGE
POINT BY WHICH THE CONTRACTOR FAILS TWICE THE NUMBER OF APPRENTICE
HOURS AT THE APPRENTICE RATE BY WHICH THE CONTRACTOR FAILED TO MEET
THE APPLICABLE REQUIREMENT.
(B) PAYMENTS COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID TO:

HOUSE BILL 957 9
(1) THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 17–602 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(2) A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM OPERATING AND
TRAINING APPRENTICES IN THE STATE OR AN ORGANIZATION THAT HAS
REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS LOCATED IN THE STATE, FOR THE
PURPOSE OF SUPPORTING THESE PROGRAMS.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURES FOR THE COLLECTION AND DISTRIBUTION OF
PAYMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.